hunspell-en-ru/src/wiki_ru_RU.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY -оаитенрсвйлпкьыяудмзшбчгщюжцёхфэъАВСМКГПТЕИЛФНДОЭРЗЮЯБХЖШЦУЧЬЫЪЩЙЁc
FLAG num
KEY ёйцф|cс|жшщ|рл|ио|ао|еи|пр|дб|ьъ|ий
BREAK 0
REP 2
REP - _
REP е ё

SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 0 стов .
SFX 1857 Y 1
SFX 1857 0 стое .
SFX 1799 Y 1
SFX 1799 0 стой .
SFX 1076 Y 1
SFX 1076 0 стом .
SFX 2563 Y 1
SFX 2563 0 овее .
SFX 2481 Y 1
SFX 2481 0 овей .
SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 0 шими .
SFX 656 Y 1
SFX 656 0 ва .
SFX 861 Y 1
SFX 861 0 ве .
SFX 1843 Y 1
SFX 1843 0 во .
SFX 2637 Y 1
SFX 2637 0 кие .
SFX 1977 Y 1
SFX 1977 0 кий .
SFX 2566 Y 1
SFX 2566 0 ким .
SFX 1209 Y 1
SFX 1209 0 кин .
SFX 1860 Y 1
SFX 1860 0 рит .
SFX 2608 Y 1
SFX 2608 0 рия .
SFX 2207 Y 1
SFX 2207 0 ичность .
SFX 1903 Y 1
SFX 1903 0 инкам .
SFX 923 Y 1
SFX 923 0 ьную .
SFX 2906 Y 1
SFX 2906 0 рованиям .
SFX 1019 Y 1
SFX 1019 0 ковой .
SFX 587 Y 1
SFX 587 0 вайтесь .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 0 ируется .
SFX 1230 Y 1
SFX 1230 0 ствуют .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 0 аниям .
SFX 2366 Y 1
SFX 2366 0 ающиеся .
SFX 2008 Y 1
SFX 2008 0 евшего .
SFX 1137 Y 1
SFX 1137 0 ающие .
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 ающий .
SFX 1136 Y 1
SFX 1136 0 ающим .
SFX 2792 Y 1
SFX 2792 0 товых .
SFX 1740 Y 1
SFX 1740 0 ничаю .
SFX 1776 Y 1
SFX 1776 0 ничая .
SFX 1869 Y 1
SFX 1869 0 руйте .
SFX 2324 Y 1
SFX 2324 0 анного .
SFX 2927 Y 1
SFX 2927 0 ящими .
SFX 2969 Y 1
SFX 2969 0 нгами .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 вавшую .
SFX 1606 Y 1
SFX 1606 0 ываюсь .
SFX 137 Y 1
SFX 137 0 лось .
SFX 1616 Y 1
SFX 1616 0 ываемся .
SFX 906 Y 1
SFX 906 0 вшеюся .
SFX 2459 Y 1
SFX 2459 0 ившемуся .
SFX 1552 Y 1
SFX 1552 0 ёте .
SFX 1830 Y 1
SFX 1830 0 енными .
SFX 1421 Y 1
SFX 1421 0 лов .
SFX 1861 Y 1
SFX 1861 0 лой .
SFX 1892 Y 1
SFX 1892 0 лок .
SFX 1217 Y 1
SFX 1217 0 лом .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 ившею .
SFX 2296 Y 1
SFX 2296 0 рного .
SFX 2711 Y 1
SFX 2711 0 ющейся .
SFX 1249 Y 1
SFX 1249 0 ению .
SFX 1259 Y 1
SFX 1259 0 ения .
SFX 2060 Y 1
SFX 2060 0 овичу .
SFX 1357 Y 1
SFX 1357 0 ичам .
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 0 ностей .
SFX 2204 Y 1
SFX 2204 0 ичностями .
SFX 2938 Y 1
SFX 2938 0 шиных .
SFX 1607 Y 1
SFX 1607 0 ывался .
SFX 1268 Y 1
SFX 1268 0 ениям .
SFX 2560 Y 1
SFX 2560 0 ологами .
SFX 2453 Y 1
SFX 2453 0 ившуюся .
SFX 2914 Y 1
SFX 2914 0 ота .
SFX 81 Y 1
SFX 81 0 вши .
SFX 1618 Y 1
SFX 1618 0 ывавшийся .
SFX 1803 Y 1
SFX 1803 0 стою .
SFX 2394 Y 1
SFX 2394 0 овец .
SFX 1626 Y 1
SFX 1626 0 иваюсь .
SFX 1265 Y 1
SFX 1265 0 ющая .
SFX 842 Y 1
SFX 842 0 ву .
SFX 813 Y 1
SFX 813 0 вы .
SFX 2597 Y 1
SFX 2597 0 ких .
SFX 359 Y 1
SFX 359 0 мися .
SFX 1901 Y 1
SFX 1901 0 инках .
SFX 2129 Y 1
SFX 2129 0 льницами .
SFX 1677 Y 1
SFX 1677 0 ывавшему .
SFX 2904 Y 1
SFX 2904 0 рованиях .
SFX 2782 Y 1
SFX 2782 0 изируюсь .
SFX 2642 Y 1
SFX 2642 0 чевыми .
SFX 312 Y 1
SFX 312 0 остью .
SFX 589 Y 1
SFX 589 0 ющийся .
SFX 1096 Y 1
SFX 1096 0 ируемся .
SFX 1397 Y 1
SFX 1397 0 ьщиками .
SFX 2227 Y 1
SFX 2227 0 явшими .
SFX 2804 Y 1
SFX 2804 0 ровался .
SFX 258 Y 1
SFX 258 0 ила .
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 0 или .
SFX 270 Y 1
SFX 270 0 ило .
SFX 292 Y 1
SFX 292 0 аниях .
SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 0 ничавши .
SFX 501 Y 1
SFX 501 0 щемся .
SFX 1134 Y 1
SFX 1134 0 ающих .
SFX 2881 Y 1
SFX 2881 0 рками .
SFX 1736 Y 1
SFX 1736 0 гами .
SFX 2488 Y 1
SFX 2488 0 нскую .
SFX 2107 Y 1
SFX 2107 0 ологии .
SFX 2121 Y 1
SFX 2121 0 ологий .
SFX 2933 Y 1
SFX 2933 0 ящее .
SFX 2932 Y 1
SFX 2932 0 ящей .
SFX 2931 Y 1
SFX 2931 0 ящем .
SFX 1334 Y 1
SFX 1334 0 овками .
SFX 880 Y 1
SFX 880 0 нье .
SFX 1437 Y 1
SFX 1437 0 ельное .
SFX 1446 Y 1
SFX 1446 0 ельной .
SFX 1422 Y 1
SFX 1422 0 ельном .
SFX 2182 Y 1
SFX 2182 0 нцев .
SFX 2993 Y 1
SFX 2993 0 нцем .
SFX 561 Y 1
SFX 561 0 ница .
SFX 602 Y 1
SFX 602 0 нице .
SFX 708 Y 1
SFX 708 0 нка .
SFX 1032 Y 1
SFX 1032 0 нке .
SFX 1024 Y 1
SFX 1024 0 нки .
SFX 2901 Y 1
SFX 2901 0 бах .
SFX 1627 Y 1
SFX 1627 0 ивался .
SFX 1970 Y 1
SFX 1970 0 изировавший .
SFX 2544 Y 1
SFX 2544 0 еющий .
SFX 2905 Y 1
SFX 2905 0 рованиями .
SFX 1545 Y 1
SFX 1545 0 альная .
SFX 409 Y 1
SFX 409 0 ическое .
SFX 414 Y 1
SFX 414 0 ической .
SFX 408 Y 1
SFX 408 0 ическом .
SFX 2665 Y 1
SFX 2665 0 яются .
SFX 1031 Y 1
SFX 1031 0 нкам .
SFX 1899 Y 1
SFX 1899 0 лою .
SFX 2758 Y 1
SFX 2758 0 чишь .
SFX 2263 Y 1
SFX 2263 0 овцев .
SFX 2536 Y 1
SFX 2536 0 овцем .
SFX 1975 Y 1
SFX 1975 0 еешь .
SFX 967 Y 1
SFX 967 0 нувшую .
SFX 1499 Y 1
SFX 1499 0 овского .
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 0 вшее .
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 вшей .
SFX 119 Y 1
SFX 119 0 вшем .
SFX 2236 Y 1
SFX 2236 0 явшая .
SFX 1097 Y 1
SFX 1097 0 ироваться .
SFX 1355 Y 1
SFX 1355 0 ичах .
SFX 490 Y 1
SFX 490 0 щимся .
SFX 2283 Y 1
SFX 2283 0 аемые .
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 0 аемый .
SFX 2282 Y 1
SFX 2282 0 аемым .
SFX 1985 Y 1
SFX 1985 0 иваниями .
SFX 1266 Y 1
SFX 1266 0 ениях .
SFX 731 Y 1
SFX 731 0 ировать .
SFX 1335 Y 1
SFX 1335 0 овкам .
SFX 1789 Y 1
SFX 1789 0 истого .
SFX 2625 Y 1
SFX 2625 0 тные .
SFX 2020 Y 1
SFX 2020 0 тный .
SFX 2624 Y 1
SFX 2624 0 тным .
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 0 стям .
SFX 2526 Y 1
SFX 2526 0 овца .
SFX 2525 Y 1
SFX 2525 0 овце .
SFX 544 Y 1
SFX 544 0 уй .
SFX 2718 Y 1
SFX 2718 0 ун .
SFX 2834 Y 1
SFX 2834 0 ровой .
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 0 шие .
SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 0 ший .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 шим .
SFX 2535 Y 1
SFX 2535 0 шин .
SFX 1384 Y 1
SFX 1384 0 очную .
SFX 1864 Y 1
SFX 1864 0 ба .
SFX 2819 Y 1
SFX 2819 0 бе .
SFX 2844 Y 1
SFX 2844 0 би .
SFX 916 Y 1
SFX 916 0 ьная .
SFX 998 Y 1
SFX 998 0 немте .
SFX 2670 Y 1
SFX 2670 0 яетесь .
SFX 1631 Y 1
SFX 1631 0 ивайтесь .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 шейся .
SFX 2335 Y 1
SFX 2335 0 ьщицам .
SFX 605 Y 1
SFX 605 0 ваются .
SFX 2979 Y 1
SFX 2979 0 тельностям .
SFX 2780 Y 1
SFX 2780 0 тика .
SFX 2853 Y 1
SFX 2853 0 тике .
SFX 2852 Y 1
SFX 2852 0 тики .
SFX 2106 Y 1
SFX 2106 0 ологию .
SFX 1816 Y 1
SFX 1816 0 ология .
SFX 1205 Y 1
SFX 1205 0 иваем .
SFX 2929 Y 1
SFX 2929 0 ящею .
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 0 нью .
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 0 нья .
SFX 2528 Y 1
SFX 2528 0 жами .
SFX 1445 Y 1
SFX 1445 0 ельною .
SFX 599 Y 1
SFX 599 0 ницу .
SFX 591 Y 1
SFX 591 0 ницы .
SFX 1033 Y 1
SFX 1033 0 нку .
SFX 2120 Y 1
SFX 2120 0 ологиям .
SFX 1972 Y 1
SFX 1972 0 изировав .
SFX 1969 Y 1
SFX 1969 0 изировал .
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 0 щегося .
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 0 вавшая .
SFX 2466 Y 1
SFX 2466 0 авшихся .
SFX 1007 Y 1
SFX 1007 0 овавшую .
SFX 878 Y 1
SFX 878 0 итам .
SFX 955 Y 1
SFX 955 0 очкой .
SFX 2742 Y 1
SFX 2742 0 ляв .
SFX 2812 Y 1
SFX 2812 0 ляй .
SFX 2840 Y 1
SFX 2840 0 лял .
SFX 754 Y 1
SFX 754 0 лям .
SFX 1234 Y 1
SFX 1234 0 ствуешь .
SFX 2655 Y 1
SFX 2655 0 ированную .
SFX 412 Y 1
SFX 412 0 ическою .
SFX 1029 Y 1
SFX 1029 0 нках .
SFX 2307 Y 1
SFX 2307 0 льщикам .
SFX 117 Y 1
SFX 117 0 вшею .
SFX 1760 Y 1
SFX 1760 0 овавшись .
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 0 никами .
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 0 аюсь .
SFX 2271 Y 1
SFX 2271 0 рное .
SFX 2193 Y 1
SFX 2193 0 рной .
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 0 рном .
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 0 скую .
SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 0 шийся .
SFX 2636 Y 1
SFX 2636 0 льней .
SFX 2280 Y 1
SFX 2280 0 аемых .
SFX 1256 Y 1
SFX 1256 0 ющему .
SFX 1333 Y 1
SFX 1333 0 овках .
SFX 899 Y 1
SFX 899 0 измами .
SFX 2267 Y 1
SFX 2267 0 ьщица .
SFX 2332 Y 1
SFX 2332 0 ьщице .
SFX 2058 Y 1
SFX 2058 0 ушками .
SFX 619 Y 1
SFX 619 0 ьте .
SFX 1376 Y 1
SFX 1376 0 нями .
SFX 2622 Y 1
SFX 2622 0 тных .
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 0 стях .
SFX 2524 Y 1
SFX 2524 0 овцу .
SFX 2480 Y 1
SFX 2480 0 овцы .
SFX 2903 Y 1
SFX 2903 0 ур .
SFX 1022 Y 1
SFX 1022 0 ут .
SFX 2961 Y 1
SFX 2961 0 ух .
SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100 0 ую .
SFX 585 Y 1
SFX 585 0 уя .
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 иться .
SFX 38 Y 1
SFX 38 0 ших .
SFX 1034 Y 1
SFX 1034 0 емте .
SFX 1116 Y 1
SFX 1116 0 ируясь .
SFX 2700 Y 1
SFX 2700 0 бу .
SFX 2801 Y 1
SFX 2801 0 руетесь .
SFX 730 Y 1
SFX 730 0 истами .
SFX 2657 Y 1
SFX 2657 0 ированному .
SFX 2879 Y 1
SFX 2879 0 рского .
SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 0 ался .
SFX 1705 Y 1
SFX 1705 0 ивавшие .
SFX 1181 Y 1
SFX 1181 0 ивавший .
SFX 1704 Y 1
SFX 1704 0 ивавшим .
SFX 1098 Y 1
SFX 1098 0 ировался .
SFX 1312 Y 1
SFX 1312 0 ывавши .
SFX 394 Y 1
SFX 394 0 ика .
SFX 402 Y 1
SFX 402 0 ике .
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 0 ики .
SFX 2454 Y 1
SFX 2454 0 ившихся .
SFX 1192 Y 1
SFX 1192 0 ивавши .
SFX 2676 Y 1
SFX 2676 0 чева .
SFX 2675 Y 1
SFX 2675 0 чеве .
SFX 2333 Y 1
SFX 2333 0 ьщицах .
SFX 711 Y 1
SFX 711 0 чиками .
SFX 2277 Y 1
SFX 2277 0 нская .
SFX 2798 Y 1
SFX 2798 0 руйся .
SFX 93 Y 1
SFX 93 0 ные .
SFX 67 Y 1
SFX 67 0 ный .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 ным .
SFX 250 Y 1
SFX 250 0 йте .
SFX 2977 Y 1
SFX 2977 0 тельностях .
SFX 2851 Y 1
SFX 2851 0 тику .
SFX 506 Y 1
SFX 506 0 щуюся .
SFX 1204 Y 1
SFX 1204 0 ивает .
SFX 2372 Y 1
SFX 2372 0 ающегося .
SFX 2807 Y 1
SFX 2807 0 ровалась .
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 0 ологиях .
SFX 1429 Y 1
SFX 1429 0 ельному .
SFX 2471 Y 1
SFX 2471 0 авшемуся .
SFX 244 Y 1
SFX 244 0 алась .
SFX 2620 Y 1
SFX 2620 0 цевым .
SFX 114 Y 1
SFX 114 0 вшими .
SFX 1876 Y 1
SFX 1876 0 ровавши .
SFX 863 Y 1
SFX 863 0 итах .
SFX 954 Y 1
SFX 954 0 очкою .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 лят .
SFX 752 Y 1
SFX 752 0 лях .
SFX 2811 Y 1
SFX 2811 0 ляю .
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 0 ляя .
SFX 1745 Y 1
SFX 1745 0 ничайте .
SFX 978 Y 1
SFX 978 0 нувшая .
SFX 2305 Y 1
SFX 2305 0 льщиках .
SFX 2724 Y 1
SFX 2724 0 скам .
SFX 2216 Y 1
SFX 2216 0 рною .
SFX 2627 Y 1
SFX 2627 0 тному .
SFX 436 Y 1
SFX 436 0 ваем .
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 0 та .
SFX 17 Y 1
SFX 17 0 те .
SFX 1464 Y 1
SFX 1464 0 ти .
SFX 1828 Y 1
SFX 1828 0 то .
SFX 2329 Y 1
SFX 2329 0 ьщицу .
SFX 2328 Y 1
SFX 2328 0 ьщицы .
SFX 925 Y 1
SFX 925 0 нете .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 ав .
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 ай .
SFX 2266 Y 1
SFX 2266 0 ак .
SFX 162 Y 1
SFX 162 0 ал .
SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 0 ам .
SFX 697 Y 1
SFX 697 0 ан .
SFX 1375 Y 1
SFX 1375 0 очная .
SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53 0 ось .
SFX 1513 Y 1
SFX 1513 0 мами .
SFX 521 Y 1
SFX 521 0 имте .
SFX 2581 Y 1
SFX 2581 0 тора .
SFX 2648 Y 1
SFX 2648 0 торе .
SFX 1184 Y 1
SFX 1184 0 телям .
SFX 1964 Y 1
SFX 1964 0 изируем .
SFX 1702 Y 1
SFX 1702 0 ивавших .
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 0 ику .
SFX 2674 Y 1
SFX 2674 0 чеву .
SFX 2746 Y 1
SFX 2746 0 чевы .
SFX 2706 Y 1
SFX 2706 0 ющимися .
SFX 1870 Y 1
SFX 1870 0 руешь .
SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 0 авшего .
SFX 1013 Y 1
SFX 1013 0 овавшему .
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 0 ных .
SFX 437 Y 1
SFX 437 0 етесь .
SFX 1646 Y 1
SFX 1646 0 ически .
SFX 1404 Y 1
SFX 1404 0 очного .
SFX 1018 Y 1
SFX 1018 0 овавшая .
SFX 2618 Y 1
SFX 2618 0 цевых .
SFX 2171 Y 1
SFX 2171 0 чному .
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 0 ующийся .
SFX 342 Y 1
SFX 342 0 ишься .
SFX 2662 Y 1
SFX 2662 0 ированная .
SFX 737 Y 1
SFX 737 0 ируют .
SFX 2319 Y 1
SFX 2319 0 анными .
SFX 1297 Y 1
SFX 1297 0 вому .
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 0 сках .
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 0 ская .
SFX 464 Y 1
SFX 464 0 вавшего .
SFX 2103 Y 1
SFX 2103 0 чам .
SFX 2408 Y 1
SFX 2408 0 лениями .
SFX 2294 Y 1
SFX 2294 0 рными .
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 авши .
SFX 2071 Y 1
SFX 2071 0 ора .
SFX 2105 Y 1
SFX 2105 0 оре .
SFX 2112 Y 1
SFX 2112 0 рей .
SFX 2243 Y 1
SFX 2243 0 рен .
SFX 439 Y 1
SFX 439 0 вает .
SFX 725 Y 1
SFX 725 0 ировавши .
SFX 495 Y 1
SFX 495 0 ту .
SFX 403 Y 1
SFX 403 0 ты .
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 0 ть .
SFX 1818 Y 1
SFX 1818 0 ар .
SFX 657 Y 1
SFX 657 0 ат .
SFX 12 Y 1
SFX 12 0 ах .
SFX 182 Y 1
SFX 182 0 аю .
SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76 0 ая .
SFX 1924 Y 1
SFX 1924 0 инкой .
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 0 ется .
SFX 1310 Y 1
SFX 1310 0 ывайте .
SFX 2382 Y 1
SFX 2382 0 ствовавшую .
SFX 1095 Y 1
SFX 1095 0 ируетесь .
SFX 1671 Y 1
SFX 1671 0 ывавшую .
SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 0 ться .
SFX 2646 Y 1
SFX 2646 0 тору .
SFX 2645 Y 1
SFX 2645 0 торы .
SFX 1182 Y 1
SFX 1182 0 телях .
SFX 758 Y 1
SFX 758 0 очками .
SFX 1413 Y 1
SFX 1413 0 дам .
SFX 1963 Y 1
SFX 1963 0 изирует .
SFX 927 Y 1
SFX 927 0 ьному .
SFX 2836 Y 1
SFX 2836 0 лять .
SFX 1208 Y 1
SFX 1208 0 анье .
SFX 2996 Y 1
SFX 2996 0 нив .
SFX 487 Y 1
SFX 487 0 ние .
SFX 479 Y 1
SFX 479 0 нии .
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 0 ний .
SFX 406 Y 1
SFX 406 0 ник .
SFX 2949 Y 1
SFX 2949 0 нил .
SFX 2491 Y 1
SFX 2491 0 ним .
SFX 1697 Y 1
SFX 1697 0 нин .
SFX 1106 Y 1
SFX 1106 0 чкам .
SFX 1649 Y 1
SFX 1649 0 уется .
SFX 1673 Y 1
SFX 1673 0 ывавшими .
SFX 2710 Y 1
SFX 2710 0 ющемся .
SFX 1562 Y 1
SFX 1562 0 альное .
SFX 1551 Y 1
SFX 1551 0 альной .
